Utah statutes.
10-9a-304.   State and federal property.

Unless otherwise provided by law, nothing contained in this chapter may be construed as giving a municipality jurisdiction over property owned by the state or the United States.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

